District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-4003

Fund qualifications; terms of office; compensation.

Repealed.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-246, § 4, 38 DCR 371
Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 10, 40 DCR 7222
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5010(b), 55 DCR 7598
1981 Ed., § 47-4003.